Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Chapter 23. Burglary

§ 1201.
Burglary.

A person is guilty of burglary if he or she enters any building or structure knowing that he or she is not licensed or privileged to do so, with the intent to commit a felony, petit larceny, simple assault, or unlawful mischief. This provision shall not apply to a licensed or privileged entry, or to an entry that takes place while the premises are open to the public, unless the person, with the intent to commit a crime specified in this subsection, surreptitiously remains in the building or structure after the license or privilege expires or after the premises no longer are open to the public.

As used in this section:

“Building,” “premises,” and “structure” shall, in addition to their common meanings, include and mean any portion of a building, structure, or premises that differs from one or more other portions of such building, structure, or premises with respect to license or privilege to enter, or to being open to the public.

“Occupied dwelling” means a building used as a residence, either full time or part time, regardless of whether someone is actually present in the building at the time of entry.

A person convicted of burglary shall be imprisoned not more than 15 years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.
(c) (1) A person convicted of burglary shall be imprisoned not more than 15 years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

A person convicted of burglary and who carries a dangerous or deadly weapon, openly or concealed, shall be imprisoned not more than 20 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

A person convicted of burglary into an occupied dwelling:

shall be imprisoned not more than 25 years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both; or

shall be imprisoned not more than 30 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both, if the person carried a dangerous or deadly weapon, openly or concealed, during commission of the offense.

When imposing a sentence under this section, the court shall consider as an aggravating factor whether, during commission of the offense, the person entered the building when someone was actually present or used or threatened to use force against the occupant.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; 2013, No. 195 (Adj. Sess.), § 9.

Particular cases.

Defendant’s restraint of the victims after he entered their home created a danger independent of the risk posed by burglars entering an occupied home intent on theft. Thus, the burglary was a separate offense from kidnapping, and the motion to dismiss the kidnapping charge was properly denied. State v. Jones, 2011 VT 90, 190 Vt. 586, 44 A.3d 148, 2011 Vt. LEXIS 93 (2011).

For purposes of enhanced penalty applicable to career criminals under 18 U.S.C. § 924(e)(1), prior conviction of this section constitutes a “violent felony.” United States v. Mitchell, 745 F. Supp. 201, 1990 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12278 (D. Vt. 1990), aff'd, 932 F.2d 1027, 1991 U.S. App. LEXIS 8214 (2d Cir. 1991).

§§ 1202,
1203.
Repealed.
1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 1204.
Making or having burglar’s tools.

A person who manufactures or knowingly has in his or her possession any engine, machine, tool, or implement, adapted and designed for cutting through, forcing or breaking open any building, room, vault, safe, or other depository, in order to steal therefrom money or other property, knowing the same to be adapted and designed for such purpose, with intent to use or employ the same therefor, shall be imprisoned not more than 20 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.